<comment>YesIf they were properly matched they wouldn't have needed affirmative action to get in.This is pretty basic</comment>

<comment>Wrong. Please read the article. Many would have been excluded for reasons other than ability, while many would be admitted for reasons other than ability (the best example is the admission of children of wealthy donor alumni, regardless of ability).</comment>

<comment>Sorry but noThey are infact given extra chances despite their lack of ability.And the more you excuse their lack of ability the less chance they will become more able</comment>

<comment>"Sorry, no, I already know everything I need to know and I won't be reading the article, thanks."</comment>

<comment>I read their BS SJW articleIt was BSYou need to learn media comprehension skills</comment>

<comment>As I thought.</comment>

<comment>Your responses have been mindless pablum.  Calling this an "SJW article" is wildly inaccurate.</comment>

<comment>How would you describe an article advocating for racial discrimination against white people?SJW is pretty nice.  I could have simply called it racist</comment>

<comment>This is not an article advocating discrimination against white people.</comment>

<comment>I read their BS SJW articleIt was BSSo what is wrong with it? Besides that it disagrees with your world view.</comment>

<comment>Sadly, many students get forced into a "dumbed down" class thanks to politically correct Affirmative Action token student placements and their insulting Leftist Overlords.It's a disservice to the students who wouldn't otherwise qualify to be there without a skin color quota AND to the other students who get dragged down so the others can (maybe?) keep up.</comment>

<comment>They are not dumbing down college classes for the benefit of lower-scoring black students. The proponents of the mismatch theory argue that students admitted with lower scores under AA programs are ill equipped to keep up academically and fail or drop out.</comment>

<comment>Harvard is being sued because their affirmative action program gave 230 SAT "bonus points" to black applicants and 185 "bonus points" to Hispanic applicants, while giving no points to white applicants and NEGATIVE 50 "bonus points" to Asian-American applicants.This is not hypothetical. Unless you maintain that SATs are a fraud that measure nothing, you have under-performing students being given a big advantage on the basis of skin color.Not only did Harvard do this, but everybody knew they did it -- which is a whole 'nother factor in the mismatch theory. Question: if you were a freshman at Harvard taking a tough science course and had to find three other students to partner with for group assignment, wouldn't it have been perfectly rational on your part to seek out white and Chinese-American students while avoiding black and Hispanic students?</comment>

<comment>No, since I would rather find out what the students were ACTUALLY  achieving instead of using racial blinders to select those who MIGHT, depending on their skin color perhaps help me if each individual student was some sort of generic representative of a class that society has chosen to malign.In others words, no. I have taught plenty of not very bright white and "Chinese-American" students, as well as plenty of smart ones.And I would maintain that the SATs reflect a cultural mindset, so they MAY NOT actually reflect the ability to achieve.  There is more about standardized high-pressure exams that I might talk about, but I won't, since this ends up being a circular argument.</comment>

<comment>The question is this, there is no authoritative measure of how many students get admitted due to affirmative action versus those that got in based on other criteria.Texas as in large part made issue moot by admitting the top 10% from high schools across the state. It should also be noted that black students at UT Austin have the highest graduation rate of any university in the UT system. That and the fact that other students both black and white with better academic records than Fischer also got rejected from UT Austin further weakens the merit of the Fisher case.In short her race didn't hurt her chances of getting into UT Austin, academic qualifications did.</comment>

<comment>The enforcement mechanism is lawsuits.  Both from the feds and individuals.As for race didn't hurt her chances....The irony is thick here don't you think?  How do you know she wasn't discriminated against?   You can't actually prove why she was rejected,  The law says the burden of proof is on the university to prove they didn't discriminate against her.  But seeing as how they admit to race being a factor in admissions I don't think they have much of a case</comment>

<comment>Then what explains the fact that black students with better grades and test scores than she got were also rejected, while white students with lower grades and scores got accepted.</comment>

<comment>The black kids were supposed to be rejected whether or not they had better grades and test scores. That was her spot by birthright. If she didn't get it that meant someone took from her what was rightfully hers. The university owed her that admission because her dad and sister got in.</comment>

<comment>Which is why the Left is demanding large preferences despite its apparent failure....</comment>

<comment>Agreed Abby Fisher did want a large preference which she didn't get</comment>

<comment>Except that's not what she's asking for and there's no reason to think that's what she'd get even if that was what (you think) she secretly wants.   Whatever her motives though, the fact remains that blacks and, to lesser extent, latinos are held to a very different standard and this has consequences for whites and asians that would otherwise be competitive for those slots.</comment>

<comment>Whites have been held to a different standard since the origin of the country. It was designed to work for their advantage to the disadvantage of all others. When you have been in a privileged position any attempt to redress this feels like disadvantage."Affirmative action was originally designed to be a modest set of policies that would expand opportunities for people of color who have suffered discrimination and racism in a society built around protecting unearned white advantages."Chauncey DeVegaThese unearned advantages (legacy admits,etc) are never talked about or dismissed as legitimate considerations.</comment>

<comment>1: History is history.  It does not follow that just because blacks were discriminated in earlier generations that therefore the reason blacks lag today is significantly related to that.  Most of these achievement gaps today are within the very same schools and exist even once you adjust for SES, birthweight, etc etc.  Moreover, there is little reason to think that schools explain much of the systematic differences we do find (URMs in majority-minority schools tend to be poorer and less educated than average..... their counter-parts in other groups also under-perform relative to their own groups).  AA is also about individual students and their race, not their SES or the sorts of schools they attended.2: Legacy preferences only benefited that small fraction of legacies.  The vast majority of whites did not benefit from this sort of thing and, in fact, if anyone was affected by it would have been the more academically qualified students, i.e., mostly whites/jews/asians/etc.3: Despite the fact that many schools had discriminatory policies/behaviors, it also true that very few blacks would have been academically qualified in earlier generations anyways.  Very few are truly academically qualified today and even fewer would have been qualified in earlier generations when the so-called "achievement gaps" were somewhat larger.  Many of the HBCUs also used to be fairly strong academically, but AA at PWIs has largely stripped them of the sorts of students they used to attract.4: Affirmative action does not work and is probably counter-productive (mismatch).  Blacks obtain much lower GPAs.  Blacks graduate at much lower rates.  Blacks sort into easier subjects and majors (which actually understates the GPA gaps significantly).  Blacks in competitive schools tend to self-segregate.  Blacks don't graduate with the same skills as their non-URM counterparts and employers know this.  This tends to amplify perceptions of bias/discrimination on the part of blacks and encourage non-URM groups of think of blacks as being less capable since the vast majority of blacks they interact with in school perform at a much lower level.</comment>

<comment>"1: History is history. It does not follow that just because blacks were discriminated in earlier generations that therefore the reason blacks lag today is significantly related to that."That statement is so patently ridiculous that you should have stopped right there. If history doesn't matter then tell me why (believer or not) we can't do anything on December 25th except go to the movies & eat Chinese food?Nothing that happens today is significantly related to the past, GTFOHWTBS</comment>

<comment>[citation needed]Christmas is a holiday that many of secular and non-christian religious people choose to celebrate today, it's not merely "the past".   If you want to talk about how Christmas affects the present you can credibly point to actual current on-going behaviors.If you want to talk about how the legacy of slavery or jim crow affects the present you need to reference the past because neither have been around for a long time now.  There are now multi-generational affirmative action admits and we're still talking about the past and assuming that the past must explain the present despite much evidence to the contrary.  Now I know there are countless progressives that take as an article of faith that history explains the present, but it's mostly a belief system, a secular modern religion in many respects.Why exactly is it that two people with upper-middle class families in the elite prep schools should be treated very differently because of their skin color when it comes to admissions?   Why should the black student with easier courses, lower GPA, and much lower SAT scores be treated preferentially over the other students?  What about over asian students in the same school with even higher GPA, test scores, etc?   Why should the black student be given a preference over Joe six-pack that got higher GPA, higher test scores, etc despite much less money, less educated parents, and mediocre schooling?  How does this make sense?  How can you possibly claim to make up for past injustices by arbitrarily redistributing slots to individuals, especially when most of those individuals are already pretty high SES?Glad you agree with me. :-)</comment>

<comment>Salary does not equal wealth. The same salary doesn't imply the same experience.https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=...'Brevity is the soul of wit'Shakespeare </comment>

<comment>1: When we talk about AA, we're talking about schools discriminating on the basis of race, not wealth or income.  If these schools wanted to do affirmative action on wealth I suspect you'd hear a lot less complaining.2: Family wealth is a weak predictor of test scores and academic outcomes.3: The B-W wealth gaps are largely mediated by education AND income (some gaps remain, but they're not that large).4: Wealth does not come close to closing these gaps. cite.5: Most of the achievement gaps are within the very same class rooms/schools remain large after controls for income, education, etc.6: Parental education is a much stronger predictor of academic outcomes and almost completely mediates the associations with income and wealth.7: When I say income I'm talking about fairly comprehensive measures of income that include non-salary income, like investment income, social security, etc.8: Contrary to blowhards like TNC and Tim Wise, very little of the racial wealth gap today can be attributed to those historic policies.  Moreover, the history behind those policies is much more complex than TNC et al lets on....Long story short, the wealth gap has little to do with these policies and the wealth gap is a terrible rationale for why blacks cannot be expected to measure up in 2015.</comment>

<comment>"1: When we talk about AA, we're talking about schools discriminating on the basis of race, not wealth or income.  If these schools wanted to do affirmative action on wealth I suspect you'd hear a lot less complaining"Why do we never refer to legacy admissions as 'discriminating against people whose relatives didn't go the school?'Much like AA has primarily helped white women more than anyone, class or income based AA would help poor whites more than anyone. I guess that's the point, some whites have been left behind even though we created a system to work to their advantage. I guess we can't worry about systemic advantages until every white person has had another chance to take advantage of it."Long story short, the wealth gap has little to do with these policies and the wealth gap is a terrible rationale for why blacks cannot be expected to measure up in 2015."Black people are fine given the circumstances. It's the Abby Fishers that we have been propping up for centuries. It's amazing the buckets of white tears that have been shed for her and people like her.</comment>

<comment>*Many* people actually do feel that way.  To the extent that legacy preferences are significant this is a legitimate argument.  On the other hand, if legacy admissions have negligible effects on the academic characteristics of the school and have other offsetting benefits, like increased alumni giving, stronger alumni networks, etc, one can argue they are perhaps not so bad, i.e., the offsetting may cancel out the negative effects in the form of cheaper net cost, stronger employment effects, etc.... even for the non-legacy group as a whole.  Moreover, most of the empirical data suggests that the actual quantitive effects in most schools are modest (non-URM legacies have test scores and GPAs very similar to the non-URM non-legacies--nothing even close to approaching the size of the AA preferences) and these effects only work within particular schools, i.e., people without legacy connections still end up in similar sorts of schools (probably negligible aggregate social effects)I don't endorse the practice, but it's really not all that significant (especially not net-net). Private schools should be allowed to do this sort of thing even if it's arguably a "mistake".  It is not socially destructive in the same way that discriminating on the basis of race, gender, religion, etc are.  Public schools are a different kettle of fish legally and democratically.That's just not true in most selective undergraduate programs.  Women have equivalent academic profiles as compared to comparable men, perhaps even a bit stronger nationally, and they earn somewhat higher GPAs (albeit less so when you consider the rigor of the classes/majors they are in).  In law schools, business schools, and the like there is an argument that they get some modest preferences, but none of these potential preferences come remotely close to what we see with affirmative action (especially not when you consider that female URMs are significantly more likely to benefit under AA).Asking that blacks are, at the very least, compared to whites and asians of similar SES and similar schools is not unreasonable.  Giving upper middle class blacks advantages on the basis of their race, over and above better qualified whites and asians from much less privileged environments, is actually racist and leads to understandable resentment.  If blacks cannot or will not work hard enough to perform at a sufficiently high level to gain fair admissions to elite schools without racial bias, then that is their "problem" (and is probably actually to their long run benefit given mismatch and externalities associated with these sorts of practices).Not quite true and the gaps within the very same schools are large and actually increase in more competitive, generally higher SES, schools.</comment>

<comment>I see that your concern trolling about the relative academic success of African Americans is indefatigable."Not quite true and the gaps within the very same schools are large and actually increase in more competitive, generally higher SES, schools."However, African Americans graduate from highly selective colleges and universities at a higher rate than from regular ones, so if your concern for African American performance is genuine you would want more African Americans at highly selective colleges not fewer.</comment>

<comment>No, of course it's higher!  Affirmative action cascades down nationally from the elites, with fairly consistent B-W gaps at all levels of selectivity, and the more selective universities tend to attract the lions share of the stronger students.My argument is that they would likely do better in the counter-factual, i.e., ~0 preferences, and that looking for apparent marginal effects on graduation rates based on a few observables within the status quo is a very incomplete way of looking at the problem.  Graduation rates today are also just the tip of the iceberg.  You should be aware that:(1) it is not as if they graduate at equivalent rates.(2) there are large gaps whether you look at graduation by family income or parental education levels.(3) much data shows that academic indicators are the strongest predictors of graduation rates.  For instance, undergraduate GPA is much more strongly correlated with graduation rates than family SES.(4) there is a direct relationship between academic index (SAT+HSGPA) and graduation rates and this pattern holds if you look at differences within schools.(5) most studies that presumably look for mismatch with controls are seriously confounded by unobservable characteristics/lurking variables.  That it say that while SAT and HSGPA are important predictors when you control for one or both, which are strongly correlated with mismatch indicators, and then look at those associations, there are still bound to be significant differences between students that you're not controlling for.  The stronger, more motivated, URMs are apt to apply to more selective schools and stronger schools are more likely to select these amongst individuals in ways that are very difficult to effectively control for.  Although several studies *have* found mismatch evidence in this dimension, I'd argue that almost all existing studies are systematically biased by these unobservable differences (it's not like schools go out of their way to find the weakest students within their admissions targets or as if the weakest students are more likely to apply!) and ought to be taken with a few large grains of salt.Btw- similar-to-even-larger "effects" (statistical associations) are found for other groups, including whites (those these findings are seriously confounded).  Other things being relatively equal, I would like to see all groups perform at their highest possible level, but I am unclear as to why you think we should place a greater priority on the welfare of blacks than other groups on the basis of their self-identified race, especially when those blacks happen to be even higher SES than the non-URM groups that would otherwise be admitted.</comment>

<comment>The black family was in tact through the 1950's.  Its disintegration, and the resulting ills, can't rightly be pinned on the legacy of slavery.  Google "Thomas Sowell" and "legacy of slavery" for the skinny on this issue.</comment>

<comment>I don't have to google Thomas Sowell. I've read almost all of his syndicated columns since I was a teenager. He is the patron saint of respectability politics.Until 1865 it was legal to break up black families by selling family members to other slave owners. After 1865, a system of indentured servitude known as sharecropping was the law of the land. Fathers were forcibly removed from their families on a regular basis and put into a system of quasi-slavery.http://www.slaverybyanothernam...In addition to not having full and equal protection under the law and having laws (Jim Crow) specifically designed to steal money and opportunities. Let's not forget the racially discriminatory implementation of the New Deal, stealing more money and resources from African-Americans. But your right, none of that matters because the statistics for 'intact families' were better. Please tell me you would want to live under those conditions. And tell me how horrible affirmative action is for white people compared to the historical conditions it attempts to remedy.</comment>

<comment>His claim is not that affirmative action is horrible for white people.  His claim is that it is bad for black people.</comment>

<comment>What I don't get is why every lawsuit where a white person claims they were victimized by AA succeeds, and every lawsuit where a black person claims they were victimized by redlining or discriminatory lending fails.</comment>

<comment>What colour is the sky in your world?</comment>

<comment>Ugh, what are you talking about???? Lots of discriminatory lending lawsuits have succeeded and lots of money has changed hands over these issues (no comparison!).   The standards of evidence for discrimination cases of this sort are pitifully low too (see: "disparate impact").  Lenders don't need to actually discriminate on race and may even have very good financial reasons for making the decisions they do and yet still lose....</comment>

<comment>The standards of evidence for discrimination cases of this sort are pitifully low tooNope. The standards are the same as in every civil case. The burden remains on the claimant. Lenders don't need to actually discriminate on race and may even have very good financial reasons for making the decisions they do and yet still lose....People lose cases all the time for reasons that don't make sense until one reads the decision. It is rare that individual lenders will sue, simply because if they had to borrow in the first place, they wouldn't have the money to sue. But ya, keep inventing your BS.No lender in America is forced to make a loan that they would not make to another person. Thus, if the risk is the same, they may not discriminate. If they wouldn't make the loan to a white person with the same risk, they don't have to make that loan to a minority.</comment>

<comment>That is not true.  When protected groups claim disparate impact they only need to show that some action or pattern of behavior had a disproportionate adverse impact on their protected class (hint: it only applies to some specific groups--as a straight non-disabled WASP male etc etc I'll never be able make these claims).  Finding a statistical difference is good enough to get the ball rolling and they do not need to establish intent to prevail (rarely do they even bother with intent).  Businesses, employers, and the like are usually forced to mount a necessity defense but that is often not good enough.  The deck is very much stacked against the defendants in these cases and many defendants have been forced to settle over what are, in my view, good and perfectly reasonable practices.If these same legal standards applied to non "minority" groups and courts were similarly inclined to favor those claims, affirmative action would have been ended long ago.But the risk is not the same and, besides, that's not how it actually works.  They don't literally compare an otherwise identical borrower, i.e., in the same neighborhood, with the same credit score, with the same LTV, with the same existing assets and liabilities, and the same education and job history.   These claims are often made on the barest of comparisons, often even where there are well established differences in risk profiles.</comment>

<comment>So where is the evidence that the burden is NOT on the claimant? Your incoherent ranting is not evidence, nor is it law.Under the Community Reinvestment Act, a lender may not deny a loan to someone if they would otherwise grant that loan to someone else. There is NOTHING that forces any lender to make loans of any quality but the lender must be equal in doing so.Until you can show some case where a lender was charged for not making a loan that they should have, then you have nothing.BTW, you really should source the BS on your blog.</comment>

<comment>Reading comprehension!  I did not say that there is zero burden.  I said the burden is ridiculously low.  I specifically referenced disparate impact theory to explain myself.  Once the plaintiff has demonstrated that statistical gap exists, which are often easy to find and easy to establish, the burden  shifts to the defendant to justify the "business necessity" of those practices.  There is usually little in the way of guidance on what constitutes a necessity.  A practice can have clear cost and efficiency implications and still be a loser.  This is particularly problematic when it comes to blacks and, to lesser extent, latinos because there are quite significant underlying differences in the population, including some very well documented ones, that produce expected gaps much larger than the various rules of thumb employed by the courts for disparities of this sort (e.g., 80%, four-fifths, etc) and because a large fraction of society, including the courts, chooses to be willfully ignorant about this evidence and its implications.I did not specifically reference the CRA and you totally miss the point.  Concepts like "equality" must inherently be statistical in nature since you cannot compare A to B apples-to-apples in these sorts of situations.  The question often centers around which statistical methods one employs, what information one admits into the analysis, which independent variables are included, and how the model is specified.  Leaving the more technical issues aside, plaintiffs can often find significant statistical associations with race (in particular) without ever demonstrating intent and any element of facial discrimination, i.e., the mere fact that disparities exist after the crudest of controls is enough to convince some that there is "disparate impact" (which many wrongly interpret to be actual evidence of guilt).You may try reading Clarence Thomas's dissent to a recent sweeping decision that further entrenches this interpretation in the housing market.What does this even mean?  Lenders have been sued many times for mere statistical disparities and, contrary to your apparent impression, these differences need not just occur in the binary approved vs rejected dimension. They also occur in the credit terms, interest rates, fees, markets they choose to operate in, etc.Actually I usually direct link to outside materials.  I also do much of my own analysis, but  if you're statistically literate, you can reproduce them relatively easily with the publicly accessible data sources I reference (e.g., NLSY, ELS, HDMA, NLSF, etc).</comment>

<comment>Sourcing a 90 page thesis without referring to to what you are intending is sloppy and the sign of a desperate person.Griggs  was a clear discrimination case. The court saw through the smoke screen defense.Disparate impact does not lower the bar. It must still demonstrate that the discrimination occurs. In all civil cases, after the plaintiff makes their claim, the defendant must answer the claim. The bar remains the same. In Griggs, the Court outlined that any employment tests must be reasonably related to the job requirements. That is the statutory requirement, not some new evidentiary standard.Above you wrote; When protected groups claim disparate impact they only need to show that some action or pattern of behavior had a disproportionate adverse impact on their protected class . That is not true and you still haven't shown any evidence of it.*** ... because a large fraction of society, including the courts, chooses to be willfully ignorant about this evidence and its implications.Uummm, the courts are the ones that interpret the law. That sort of demonstrates you don't understand what you are babbling about.***I did not specifically reference the CRA and you totally miss the point.The CRA is the primary statute that prohibits lending discrimination. It specifically forbids financial institutions from denying loans to a minority that they would have made to a non-minority UNDER COMPARABLE SITUATIONS. Again, above you wrote; Lots of discriminatory lending lawsuits have succeeded and lots of money has changed hands over these issues (no comparison!).   The standards of evidence for discrimination cases of this sort are pitifully low too (see: "disparate impact").  Lenders don't need to actually discriminate on race and may even have very good financial reasons for making the decisions they do and yet still lose.... Lots of discriminatory lending lawsuits have succeeded and lots of money has changed hands over these issues (no comparison!).   The standards of evidence for discrimination cases of this sort are pitifully low too (see: "disparate impact").  Lenders don't need to actually discriminate on race and may even have very good financial reasons for making the decisions they do and yet still lose.... That is wrong.  Again, you can't show any evidence of any court case where a financial institution did not discriminate but lost the case.***You may not like it, and apparently you don't, but the courts have not changed their burden in civil cases.</comment>

<comment>I specifically referenced disparate impact.  Since you are seemingly ignorant of the implications of the law and its shortcomings you might actually need to read the most of it.Uh, no.  [citation needed]You obviously do not understand the law and have read little, if any, scholarship in this area.Again, you demonstrate your sophomoric understanding of the law and the empirical literature.   Since you are evidently incapable of reading any of the literature, including the stuff I cited, allow me to quote a paragraph or two:</comment>

<comment>One lawsuit attempts to maintain systemic white advantage; the other attempts to dismantle it. It should be pretty obvious which one is going to win</comment>

<comment>What? By birthright? Uummm, no. Only the top 10% of high school students have any right. She wasn't in the top 10%. Claiming that her scores showed she should have a seat fails when they are compared to others that were also denied but had even better scores.</comment>

<comment>I think we are in violent agreement. My comment was sarcasm </comment>

<comment>Dang internet. They didn't include that sarcasm button and so many comments have been misunderstood.</comment>

<comment>No one has a right to a spot by birthright.  I find it hard to believe that you are summarizing her amicus brief accurately.</comment>

<comment>Given the statistics that everyone knows about this case, it's the only logical conclusion one could come to if you side with her.</comment>

<comment>She actually is a terrible plaintiff. Her grades and SAT scores put her in the middle of the pack for her UT freshman class. The number of minority students (excluding those admitted under the top 10% rule, which also admits a lot of under qualified white students) admitted to UT with worse grades than hers is likely numerically smaller than the number of people with better grades than hers who didn't get in. She has a very weak case on the merits.</comment>

<comment>No, this precisely the sort of candidate that is most affected by these policies.  A much better applicant may have been admitted to an even stronger institution or otherwise have a harder time arguing harm.  Moreover, it seems bizarre to me that the left wants to argue that she's a middling student on one hand and then, on the other, blow off the fact that URMs (particularly blacks) are systematically admitted to as or more competitive schools with substantially weaker grades and weaker test scores on the basis of their self-identified race (and perform somewhat worse than their test scores and HSGPA would suggest on average).</comment>

<comment>My point is, if UT admitted people only on the basis of grades and SAT scores Abigail Fisher would not be admitted. Her grades, while good, weren't good enough.Why are you weeping for this poor girl who never would have made it on merit alone? Why do you see her as the victim, when the fact that she barely missed the cutoff, meant she was a beneficiary of affirmative action, even though you don't call it that?</comment>

<comment>I'm not weeping for her, but facts are facts. Not every student admitted without preferences is going to be an excellent student.   Her SAT score of 1180 put her about 60 points above the 25th percentile of SAT test takers at the school at the time and about 94 points ahead of the median in-state black student that didn't get in under the top-10 program (meaning that many of them would have a 100-200 gap relative to her "not good enough" scores).   Her grades weren't top-notch (top 12%) but they were earned from a more competitive than average high school too and I believe they're generally in the in-state ballpark.  I think it's safe to say that she was in fact a more competitive student than the vast majority of the URM students that were actually admitted under similar circumstances (i.e., in-state and outside of the normal top 10 program).Why should blacks be held to a lower standard just because they are black?  I am much more sympathetic to alternatives like the top-10 program, but the truth is that very few blacks are competitive even within the same high schools and those that are are usually at lousy majority-minority schools where it's much easier to earn top-10 percent (i.e., both less able and less prepared).</comment>

<comment>To be against affirmative action and to believe everything should be decided on merit alone means to believe that Abigail Fisher doesn't deserve to go to UT.  It's that simple. The only reason she got as close as she did was the legacy boost, and you don;t hear her complaining about that.I'm not saying blacks should be held to a lower standard. My point was twofold: very few blacks were admitted with lower grades (because most minorities came in under the 10% program, which AF isn't complaining about). They were "a factor of a factor of a factor". And more importantly, why are you saying that legacies/rich kids/kids from underrepresented regions/kids with military connections/kids from single-parent homes/kids with interesting backstories should be held to a lower standard? Because as long as the discussion is just about race, that's what you're arguing.Face it. Abigail Fisher sucks as a test case.</comment>

<comment>I don't think that is clear and the issue is whether race should be allowed to play an instrumental role in outcomes of that sort."close" to what?  They didn't admit her and yet they clearly admitted a good number of much weaker black students outside the top 10 program.But URMs are held to a much lower standard, explicitly because of their racial identification (not because they are "poor" or attend "bad schools") and that is the real issue here.She was in the top 12% at a fairly competitive public high school and had SAT scores about 100 points above the median in-state black student outside of top 10 (26 points higher than the median hispanic student).  She also had decent extra-curiculars and the like too.  Many of those URMs were NOT admitted under the traditional top-10 program, but under a special modified race-based plan and a good number were admitted with substantially weaker numbers than her too...If you want to argue over the subjectiveness of their non-academic records, fine (not worth arguing over), but at least don't claim that you know she's objectively worse.I'm not arguing that.  From a "fairness" POV modest SES preferences would be less objectionable than discriminating on the basis of race.  Personally, if I had my druthers, the schools would just look at academics alone and would only give consideration to empirically proven bias in the methodology.  For instance, if it were proven that low-SES students actually outperformed their HSGPA or their SAT scores I'd be OK with giving a small offsetting boost to counteract that (the reality though is the data generally points in the OTHER direction).  Likewise, if the school wanted some liberal arts students I'd be OK with selecting something other than 100% STEM people, providing it's objective and they're selecting the strongest people they can select within reason.  At a practical level i'm willing to flex somewhat, some small non-warranted "tie-breaker" I could tolerate with (something akin to what legacies are given in practice at most schools today), but affirmative action and systems like that for blacks and athletic recruits are of an entirely different magnitude and they are counter-productive on multiple levels.I won't claim she's optimal, but the lefts' arguments here are silly and very instrumental.   It's the marginal applicants that have the most to lose and have the best arguments for harm here.  (Nevermind the bizzare circular arguments how she's too middling but we need AA to give lots of extra consideration to comparatively mediocre URM students)</comment>

<comment>I will try this again. If UT implemented a true merit system, UT, being a top school, could admit only people with perfect GPAs on all AP courses who earned in the 99th percentile on their SAT. They could do that now. They choose not to, but they could. That would eliminate Abigail Fisher (by your own admission) more decisively than the current system does.</comment>

<comment>1: [citation needed]2: UT Austin isn't all that elite in a national sense and not every student wants to go to the most competitive school that will take them (i.e., some students want to stay in-state or go to particular schools for their athletic program etc etc).3: Major overstatement.  There are only about 23K students nationally in the top 1% of test takers this year, much less if you exclude those that didn't get top GPA and/or aced all their APs.  Many of them would go to even more elite schools.  In fact, I just did a quick evaluation of IPEDS and found UT Austin to be ranked #112 of undergraduate programs by (estimated) mean M+V SAT score (mean of 25 & 75th SAT score).  There are roughly 172,000 enrollment slots above them.  You might rank them differently, but still....4: You're still missing the point.   Blacks and, to lesser extent, latinos are held to a much lower academic standard.  This has consequences for non-URM students that would otherwise have a much better chance of being admitted.  You can argue that athletic recruiting and the like has consequences too (although the quantitive significance in terms of average academic characteristics of most schools is much less than some here seem to believe), but there is a potential judicial remedy because of the racial angle here whereas there is not for most of these other claims.If this was working in reverse, if schools decided to give a 1 SD preference to white students in HS GPA and SAT scores and ~0 preference to blacks, would you be making these same sorts of arguments?  "Oh but the schools would fill with 99th percentile people in a pure meritocracy, ergo this form of racial discrimination doesn't actually harm the blacks with SAT test scores of just 1180 [over ~90% of which score even lower] and are in the top 12% of their academically competitive schools "....  I doubt it.</comment>

<comment>That would also eliminate all but a handful of black kids in Texas as well. The point is if not for top ten she'd be competitive. She is not a mediocre student compared to black or Mexican American kids who were admitted by top ten.</comment>

<comment>She's actually not challenging the top 10 rule (which admits plenty of under qualified whites).And even if you just look at grades and SATs, a 3.59GPA and 1180 SAT score is borderline. There were 5 black or Latino students admitted with worse grades/SATs than her. There were 168 black and Latino students with grades as good as or better than Fisher's who were denied entry. (UT is a very competitive school).http://www.propublica.org/arti...Regardless of how you feel about AA, Fisher sucks as a test case. And the fact that Blum couldn't find a better one makes me wonder if there really are that many unqualified blacks or Latinos stealing spots that should have gone to deserving whites.</comment>

<comment>The bottom half of the class by SAT at any selective university is going to be mostly comprised of students who got some sort of admissions concession, whether it's affirmative action, a legacy boost or a concession for recruited athletes -- colleges accept hundreds of white swimmers, golfers, rowers an horseback-riders under reduced academic standards.If you are a white or Asian applicant and you don't have some kind of admissions concession, any school where your SAT is below the median is a reach.</comment>

<comment>Schools are not perfectly sorted by ability and I generally disagree with your reasoning, but even if it were true the differences between blacks and whites/Asians is enormous in both test scores and hsgpa, i.e., even after all the "white" athletic recruiting and the like there is still a 1-1.5 standard deviation gap in between the groups.It is quantitatively and qualitatively different on average, much different.  No question that athletic recruiting is "real" and sometimes the preferences are large, but (1) I'm not a supporter of them (2) the proportion of the large preferences isn't that nearly large (3) there are ethical and practical differences between discrimating on race and doing so to, say, support athletic programs that arguably bring tangible benefits.</comment>

<comment>The median black admit is about 100 points per SAT section below the median white, but white students will have a much broader range of SAT scores within the student body of any given school.  In general, black students who get affirmative action will be about 7-8% of the student body at most selective schools, Latino students who get affirmative action will be another 7-8%.  Even if you assume the URM population is 20%, which is high, there are a lot of whites in the bottom half the class by SAT.But if you do not have an admissions concession, any school where you are below the median SAT is a reach.  Lots of undergrads get academic concessions that are not related to race.</comment>

<comment>That's just not true.  Also a decent number of schools have proportions this high and many people want it to be much higher still.Of course there will always be a bottom half and a top half of any school, but so what?  It doesn't follow that the bottom half got in for significant non-academic reasons.  I'm not arguing the aa is the only form of preferences, but athletic recruiting only sometimes gets that large and some of them are urm btw.   In any event, there is still very little overlap between blacks and non-urm in most selective to elite schools.</comment>

<comment>Yes it does.  Legacies outnumber URMs at many of the elite schools and public research universities have lots of varsity teams.  You don't need to get an athletic scholarship to get an academic concession as an athlete.Athletic concessions for minor sports may not be as big as the affirmative action bump, and the extent of the legacy benefit varies from school to school, and sometimes from applicant to applicant (with the children of very influential alums getting more weight on the scale).  But the bottom line is that if your academic record puts you at the median of a school's student body and you do not have some sort of academic concession, that school is a reach.  A safety school a school where your academic numbers place you above the 75th percentile.</comment>

<comment>df81 wasn't talking about athletic recruitment for the big sports, like football and basketball. Those are at least justified because the school makes a fortune off them. He or she is talking about the esoteric sports, like horseback riding. A school will admit someone with lower grades/SATs if they ride horses or play lacrosse just to get a good team, even though they don't bring in the big money of football and basketball.</comment>

<comment>I'm well aware of what he was trying to argue.  My point is that the quantitive significance of these preferences is generally much overstated.  The schools give modest preferences for competitive programs like rowing, lacrosse, squash, etc and sometimes large preferences for the real standout athletes, but:(1) the average size of these preferences typically aren't large(2) mediocre athletes in obscure sports don't get large preferences(3) most of these traditional "prep school" sports have very different academic profiles than the (now) "big time" sports like football, i.e., the top schools can fill their seats with students that are generally academically competitive with the rest of the school and still compete at high levels.  Moreover, many of these athletes do very well financially (social skills, competitiveness, etc play a role) and subsequently give money to the schools.(4) some of these sports may not have the national profile that, say, football has, but they cost a hell of a lot less and they bring in alumni (which helps with fundraising, school spirit, etc).Again, i'm not saying it's zero.  I'm pushing back on the quantitive significance.  In an ideal world I'd prefer to see more academic emphasis and less emphasis on non-academic pursuits, but nonetheless the idea that there are a great many poorly qualified white athletes in obscure sports with records comparable to the black affirmative action admits is just wrong.Put differently, my point is that affirmative action cannot be reasonably be defended as merely an offset against large non-academic preferences for white prep school athletes or some such because the great majority of these athletes are still stronger academically than the great majority of the presumably academically-admitted blacks (mostly due to AA).  Blacks are admitted with much weaker academic indexes and they perform even less well than you'd expect despite the fact that most of them don't have more to show for these preferences other than their skin color/nominal racial identification. [nevermind that racial discrimination is also qualitatively different than athletic preferences] </comment>

<comment>You can't actually prove why she was rejected,The school has already shown it was because the Texas "Top 10%" and better qualified applicants beat her.The law says the burden of proof is on the university to prove they didn't discriminate against her.Nope. The burden of proving their case is always the party making the claim.Why do you morons always have to invent your facts?</comment>

<comment>Actually, the burden of proof is on her, like in every civil case.</comment>

<comment>In short it did...If you're being admitted based on race primarily and gpa secondarily you are being held to a different standard...If she had no case, this wouldn't be before the Supreme Court...</comment>

<comment>Do you really think only cases with merit ever make it all the way to SCOTUS? I cn think of a dozen spurious cases that have made their way through the US justice system and so can you.</comment>

<comment>I can't.  There have been some where I disagreed with SCOTUS on taking the case (Hobby Lobby, Ricci, for examples) but they weren't frivolous.</comment>

<comment>Even though we would think those SC cases are frivolous, the court doesn't. They hear 100 - 150 cases every year but the public might only even hear of a half dozen. Alright, a full dozen if it's a slow news year. Most are of interest only to scholars and the legal profession.I'm sure you realize that this case is before the court because both sides think they are right and have done enough to convince four justices that they should be heard.</comment>

<comment>In short, you are making it up again. Race was not the only factor. It was a contributing factor where minorities got more points, but not even a major factor for the final acceptance.</comment>

<comment>She was not in the top 10% if her high school class and she was otherwise undifferentiated other than that she was a legacy. She wanted to be "special" because... It turns out that she wanted to be special because her father was friends with a right wing lawyer. Maybe she should have worked harder in high school.</comment>

<comment>And what's even worse is that plenty of white kids from TX get in under the top 10% rule, who have worse SAT scores than Fisher, but she doesn't care about them. Or the rich kids, kids from single-parent homes, kids with unusual backgrounds, musicians, etc. Why does she only care if some black or Latino kid jumped the line, and not anyone else? In other words, why are we demanding a meritocracy for race and race only?It doesn't change the fact that AA is probably dead in a generation. And the stupid left is clueless about how to fight it (the diversity argument is a non-starter and they're clinging to it like a life raft).</comment>

<comment>Which of your complaints about her case don't apply to those arguing for AA?</comment>

<comment>She (and Scalia) only want AA eliminated when it comes to minorities. They're happy to benefit from it in every other situation. In fact, they don't even see it as AA. Why is that?</comment>

<comment>Probably because those other things aren't AA.Legacies and athletic preferences aren't AA.</comment>

<comment>What about geographic preferences? UT admits plenty of kids from small towns in the west, even though they come from less challenging schools and don't have comparable GPAs or SAT scores. What about connections to the military? What about parents' income?And athletic preferences aren't AA but legacies certainly are. It's less-qualified students getting an unfair advantage for reasons that have nothing to do with their ability.</comment>

<comment>That's not the definition of AA and never has been.</comment>

<comment>Call it what you want. The point is, it's giving students preferences on the basis of something other than academic performance. You know it, so you;re trying to weasel out by playing semantic games.</comment>

<comment>Words have meaning.  I'm sorry you consider that a "game," but if they don't have meaning there's little point in using them to communicate.Discrimination is not ipso facto unlawful.  Only some kinds of discrimination is.  Racial discrimination is among those Congress has made unlawful.  Athletic ability or family connections are not.</comment>

<comment>It is still undeserved preferences that means someone more qualified is left out.</comment>

<comment>The question before the Court is whether or not the policy violated the Constitution, and the Court has never declared athletic ability or family connections to a university to be a suspect class.</comment>

<comment>Volokh Conspiracy over at WaPo had a blog entry on that.  It doesn't make a difference to the merits of her case, basically.It's akin to the EEOC's hiring discrimination cases:  they don't have to prove any particular person was harmed (ie. would have been hired but for) by discrimination in hiring, only that unlawful discrimination existed and they were subject to it.</comment>

<comment>And you have a problem with that?Actually, you are wrong. They need to show a case of actual harm. An institutional tendency to discriminate is evidence.Learn what "standing" is in a court case.</comment>

<comment>I know what standing is.  You obviously enjoy making yourself look ignorant.  She doesn't have to prove that she otherwise would have been selected, only that she was subject to the race-based selection criteria.  Or you could have read the article, or even the brief synopsis I already provided.Standing is established by showing there is an injury and a remedy.  It is not a particularly difficult standard to meet.In answer to your first question:  no, I don't have a problem with it.  Do you?Here's a link, since Google is apparently too complicated:https://www.washingtonpost.com...</comment>

<comment>Do you just like looking foolish?You could have looked up the article.  Since google is a problem, here's a link:  https://www.washingtonpost.com...</comment>

<comment>Seriously dude, that was stupid. No where in that link does it suggest she does not need standing. Nowhere in any of the cited cases does it show that the EEOC can just file a suit against someone. https://www.law.cornell.edu/we...The EEOC must still show that someone was harmed. They can not just file a complaint without showing someone was harmed.Your link did not even address that issue.</comment>

<comment>Doubling down on the stupid?The point of that article is that she doesn't have to prove that she would have gotten admitted but for the racial preferences.  Which is what I said and what you stupidly disputed along with displaying your ignorance about standing.Care to go for the hat trick, now?</comment>

<comment>This always seemed like an odd argument to me. If a black applicant accused an employer of discriminating against black people in hiring, what would you think if the employer said "yeah, we do prefer white people, but even if we didn't, you would still be unqualified so we still wouldn't have hired you"? Maybe that's technically a legal defense, but I don't think anyone would hesitate to say that employer is still committing discrimination.</comment>

<comment>It would be illegal if they were equally qualified or the minority was superior qualified but still passed over.</comment>

<comment>It's not a legal defense.  The plaintiff doesn't have to prove that but-for the discriminatory practices they would have gotten the job, only that they were subject to the practice or policy.</comment>

<comment>Properly matched based on what--academic performance alone? Then wave goodbye to your favorite college/universitys nationally ranked football, basketball, and other major sports teams (Im always amused when the announcers prattle on about how a lineman is an absolutely stellar academic example solely because hes majoring in a STEM discipline.And dont you think that being an all-state QB might bump up an otherwise unremarkable app to MIT or Harvard/Yale--they also have football teams that like to win. As well as have a member of their swimming/diving/rowing team on the US Olympic Team). Say farewell to legacy admissions--doesnt matter where your parents went to school, or if theyre donating money. Same with students with outstanding abilities in non-academic, non sports fields--musical abilities, drama/acting, and other such. Write off all extracurricular activities as meaningless.The fact is that colleges look at many other factors than academic performance. Why is that fine, but somehow nonacademic factors become poison when race and socioeconomic status enters the equation?I did great in high school back in the early 70s--SATs sky-high, National Merit scholar, first in my class through the college application period (blew off the last quarter of my senior year after all the decisions were made because it didnt matter--had an absolute blast the last couple of months) taking the most advanced courses my HS offered, National Honor Society, and all the other stuff thats meaningful up until the day you graduate HS. Id have been perfectly content with masking names, sex, race, athletic ability/awards, and any other identifying information and limiting admissions considerations to strictly academic records. But our college application process doesnt work that way and never has.</comment>

<comment>Athletes in revenue sports aren't even really there to be students at all, and they aren't subject to any academic admissions standards other than whatever is required to be NCAA eligible.D1 scholarship football and basketball players are semi-professional athletes who are generally only students in name only.Athletes in non-revenue sports get admissions concessions as well, but they cannot secure admissions for dramatically underqualified academic candidates the way football and basketball teams can.</comment>

<comment>You miss the point. Athletics are not viewed as "semi-pro" sports. They are extra curricular. They are students all the way, legally and under every academic standard. The reasons they are admitted is purely financial, the same as legacy students. They are given scholarships and seats over students far more academically qualified.If you are going to allow preference to athletes then it will come at the expense of someone else.</comment>

<comment>Give me a break! The idea that men's football/basketball players at schools that have large athletic programs are there to study is a complete fiction.  A football or basketball recruit with a 900 SAT can go to Stanford.They are recruited to play sports, and their readiness or ability to do college work is not a factor.</comment>

<comment>Thanks! There's a big difference between how schools like UT admit football and basketball players (truly meritocratic, has zero to do with academic ability, wildly unethical for unrelated reasons) and how they admit golf/lacrosse/polo players(given a leg up for reasons that have zero to do with GPA or SATs, not for money but because the school wants to field those teams. i.e. it considers having those teams a value to the culture of the school i.e. diversity).</comment>

<comment>It's actually worse than that.  When development offices want to get somebody into the school, they arrange for them to get hooked up with a team in a minor, less competitive sport to get an admission concession.</comment>

<comment>Except the jocks, legacies, musicians, actors, and other such do count against the number of students in the college/university.I read an analysis of the typical entering class at the Ivys a couple of years ago--by the time you back out all of the special cases--the athletes, musicians, legacies, children of the rich and famous and powerful people--half of the entering class was accounted for. The average applicant, not favored by any of the preceding and competing strictly on academics and extracurriculars, was in actuality competing for one of the slots in the remaining half of the entering class.I went to one of the military academies, which has a very hard line for the number of students--each Representative/Senator is allotted five students from his jurisdiction attending at any one time. Admit someone to play football and youve just wiped out someone else from attending ( a point of discussion among many grads, particularly when the jock shows up academically unprepared and completely unmotivated, expecting to get a pass from the life everyone else has to suffer through, because he came to play ball and in his mind deserves the special treatment he expected to get because of his specialness) Other schools might not be as restricted, but if they didnt have hundreds of athletes attending theyd have others in their place. So instead of fielding the best athletic team from the students attending, the schools specifically recruit athletes who otherwise wouldnt meet academic admissions criteria and admit them instead. Same with legacies, actors (what were Jody Fosters academic credentials again?), and others.I go back to my original point--schools today use substantial criteria other than academic performance to determine who they admit. Why is that good and desired (as in ask any fan whos team is going to a major bowl or the Sweet 16), but adding race/socioeconomic status the the existing list of other-than-academic criteria makes it evil?</comment>

<comment>Yeah, I don't think so. They'll just change the rules so athletes on college teams don't have to be real students. It would also open the door to paying college athletes, which I think would be fair.Seriously? It's because there are laws protecting people from racial discrimination. There aren't laws protecting people from discrimination about socioeconomic status (and I've never seen people call that "poison" to consider) and other nonacademic factors (like ability to play football).</comment>

<comment>So why does Scalia (and Abigail Fisher) focus only on race. There are plenty of students who got into UT ahead of Fisher even with similar or worse grades. Because they're athletes or legacies or have rich parents or are from undeserved geographic areas etc. So why does Fisher only care about meritocracy when it comes to race.Same with Scalia's argument. If mismatch theory is a real thing (data shows that minority students are more likely to graduate with Doctorates from elite universities than not) then it would theoretically apply to ALL students who fall below a certain SAT score threshold. Where is Scalia's outrage that some white kid from the Panhandle was admitted to UT even though they didn't go to a good high school?</comment>

<comment>My guess is that that would spoil the narrative.Scalia is correct if you view the situation with tunnel vision. There will always be someone who ends up disenfranchised, regardless of whatever system you implement. Fisher and Scalia just don't want that system to hurt her.</comment>

<comment>If you're asking this seriously, it's because race is a protected characteristic. You're not allowed to discriminate based on race. You are allowed to discriminate on other factors like athletic ability. So for instance, a coach can say "You can't join the team, you suck at catching the ball." But a coach cannot say "You can't join the team, you're black."</comment>

<comment>But materially, it works out to the same thing. Getting in because you have lower grades but you're black is no different than getting in because you have lower grades but you're from the Panhandle. Or you have lower grades but are a legacy. Or you have lower grades but come from a military family.</comment>

<comment>I believe for rigorous majors like engineering, test scores and GPA are pretty good predictors of success....</comment>

<comment>There's ample evidence that it's highly predictive in general (even in majors that aren't thought of as being particularly rigorous).   Moreover, if you adjust for range-restriction and sorting into universities, majors, and classes based on ability, the correlation increases quite dramatically (mean correlation of about 0.78 with SAT+HSGPA).cite</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>This is addressed in the article.Just read.</comment>

<comment>Orange doesn't do much reading or thinking, just obsessed with race.</comment>

<comment>I wonder a lot about the type of person who sees a headline that challenges a preconceived assumption, and then offers his evidence against the headline . . . without actually reading the article.</comment>

<comment>The zealots on both right and left agree:  they don't need facts or information!</comment>

<comment>LOL @ vox</comment>

<comment>Supporters of Affirmative-Action do.  Its logic, if a slot goes to a student based on their race, then a slot is taken away from another student based on race.  Thats a race based exclusion.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>If someone else didnt have the spot, Affirmative Action would not be necessary.  Again, this is the only logical conclusion.  If hyperbolic terrible analogies to Bull Connor are the order of the day, Affirmative Action supporters are analogously turning the fire hoses on Asian kids.  Of course thats ridiculous, theres an obvious difference between Bull Connor prohibiting African Americans from attending school, and a race blind policy that admits any individual, regardless of race, so long as they have the grades and SAT scores.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I dont know if Asians generally support Affirmative Action, but its not relevant  policies should treat individuals equally, rather than racially discriminate against them, even if discrimination is popular.  I agree with you about legacies, they are worse than Affirmative Action and it should be illegal for any school accepting Federal funding to have legacies.I'm not sure if blind policies disproportionately favor white males, such policies probably disproportionately favor several socio-economic categories.  Proportional to whom?  Such policies most obviously impact Asians, Jews, and other high achieving minorities.  Given the prevalence of women on college campuses,  white women would probably benefit more than white men.  I'm sure we could examine dozens of arbitrary groupings of individuals and find some groups benefiting and some not from race blind policies, but again, its not relevant, Affirmative Action is patent racial discrimination and such discrimination  should be illegal.  Unfortunately, Universities don't generally release their admissions data, so we can only speculate.The truth is, the real educational problem begins in grade school and Affirmative Action does little to benefit the people who really need help long before they get to college.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>No worries</comment>

<comment>Hah! I knew you were a young one...LOL</comment>

<comment>It is discrimination.  It's using race expressly as a basis for making the determination.</comment>

<comment>Um, NO THEY DO NOT...Asian groups are actively suing the Ivy's as a result...You really don't read much, do you?White "legacy" admissions are not as common as legacy admissions in general...Not only are they not a good thing but the fact that whites are likely to be in said group has nothing to do with racism and everything to do with numbers...Try to understand, if you have a country founded by 90% European, you are going to have a disproportionate number of Whites in this or that...It's numbers dude...I don't look at China and think it's racism that has kept whites from the top jobs there...For you Orange, so you don't have to look for anything...http://www.cnn.com/2015/05/17/...</comment>

<comment>"Asians generally support AA"Some of my friends beg to differ.</comment>

<comment>This isn't true. The percentage of underrepresented minority students in the Ivy League is higher than the percentage of legacy students. In addition, the affirmative action boost from being an underrepresented minority is bigger than the boost from being a legacy student. And being a legacy only helps if your parents also donate money to the school, so a lot of people whose parents went to the school probably didn't get much of a legacy bonus.What evidence is there that blind methods disproportionately favor white males? Orchestras are probably the best example of an industry that switched to blind methods, and when they did, the result was that way more females were hired: http://www.nber.org/papers/w59....</comment>

<comment>Why just limit it to race-blind? Why not everything blind? Why not throw out parents income and geographic location and everything else? There will be a class full of white and Asian kids from rich suburbs whose parents are doctors and who've been making their kids take SAT Prep classes since the third grade. Or recent immigrants of all colors from Tiger Mom families. No athletes or artists. No special considerations for the poor, or people with a military connection. No one from outside the Dallas, Houston, or Austin areas.</comment>

<comment>Sure.  Why not? Not like all those so-called "tiger" families are going to take up spots at every decent university.  I say let the cards fall where they may.  Students that want a less "tigerish", less academically competitive, school can always choose to apply to less competitive schools (which will no doubt be happy to admit that sort).Incidentally, the whole SAT-income thing is mostly baseless (has little to do with income per se or test prep)   High SES students are actually significantly better students on average in multiple dimensions (primary-secondary GPA, multiple other tests [including low-stakes ones people don't prep for], college GPA, etc etc).</comment>

<comment>If you can afford classes and tutors and specialized test prep, then yes, your SAT scores will be much better than people who can't afford those things, or don't come from communities where these things are valued, or well-known, or easy to obtain. Otherwise, why would all this be a million-dollar industry?</comment>

<comment>Yes, it is abnormally high.    Most people that retake it don't see average gains nearly that high and those that do are more likely to benefit (e.g., the individual that completely botched it or had some kind of family emergency/distraction).  The schools are also savvy so if you take it a bunch of times it'll be a red flag and they'll likely discount it appropriately (or take the average with similar results).More importantly, the reliable empirical studies of test prep show the average gains are quite modest and that test prep rates don't vary all that much by income.  In fact, blacks are significantly *more* likely to take test prep and see larger gains when they do (albeit still modest).Incidentally, the SAT-income link is almost entirely mediated by parental education (it's a much stronger predictor than income for SAT scores, GPA, graduation rates, etc).Because:1) Even smart people can ignorant of the evidence and fall for gimmicks.   Lots of people take homeopathic remedies (billions of dollars a year) despite almost no scientific evidence regarding efficacy or even good safety/toxicity [never mind quite a bit literature suggesting that many are actively harmful]2) People want any edge they can get, even if it's extremely marginal (moreso if they're in a presumably "advantaged" group that has negative marks for high performance....).  If you have a lot of money and really care about helping your children get into the very "best" school that will take them, then perhaps it's worth spending thousands of dollars and many hours of their time for small gains.Btw-if you look at NAEP scores or various state tests (used for NCLB and the like) you'll find very similar test-SES links (much before people start gearing up for PSAT/SAT).  This makes it very unlikely that test prep differences explains much.  cite citeMaybe in very particular tiger-mom environs (as in, heavily asian/bay area/valley), but not the typical elite environments that I'm familiar with (i.e., several of the elite-to-very selective prep schools on the west and east coast) and certainly not actual official tests that count.</comment>

<comment>Nope. That simply is not true.  The kids who get high SAT scores untutored are not helped much if at all by SAT prep classes. They gain a very small percentage of points by practice and optimizing their approach to the questions. Unfortunately, for the most competitive universities, that handful of points might be the difference between making it into your first choice vs. your third or fourth,   It's only the students who prep intensively enough to make up for not having been adequately exposed to the material in high school who gain more than a handful of points.</comment>

<comment>Most admissions processes are need blind, the problem is paying for it.  Even so, many schools with large endowments have policies paying for the full tuition for poorer students (See, e.g., Stanford).  As for geographic location, do schools other than state schools have such restrictions?  UT is an absurdly good value for the caliber of school.  The taxpayers of Texas and the Texas economy have an interest in educating Texas residents (And I say this as someone whose own kid applied to UT Austin 3 weeks ago and probably wont get in due to the 90% rule).Are you also suggesting that SAT and Grades be thrown out too?  We should not do away with merit, but more importantly, throwing out academic metrics would be guaranteed to get a class full of unprepared kids. Texas policy of accepting the top 10% of a high school class does a decent job of balancing the policy goals of offering opportunities to low income students, and ensuring that the accepted kids wont be totally unprepared, while not being overtly racial discrimination.</comment>

<comment>By geographic location I don't mean in-state residents. I mean that UT takes students from all regions of the state. The trailer park areas in the east, the virtually empty places in the West. A true meritocratic system would result in the whole class coming from Houston, Dallas or Austin and people would complain.I'm just saying, be honest about the system. Schools have always built a student body based on more than just grades and SAT scores. If you just care about merit when it comes to race, you aren't truly looking for a meritocracy.</comment>

<comment>AA is the modern Jim Crow:  doling out rewards based on race...</comment>

<comment>I suspect A A means that all other things being equal a person from a (historically) discriminated/disadvantaged group gets the nod. The acceptance then is not based on race but rather on the assumption that the person with greater advantages in his her life leading up to the selection process should rightly be expected to have done better.</comment>

<comment>My understanding is that beneficiaries of Affirmative Action receive a SAT preference averaging over 200 points:http://www.nytimes.com/2012/10...http://www.theatlantic.com/nat...</comment>

<comment>That's the crux of it: in the massively decentralized, unequal, US school system, how do you compare Sally Suburb, who went to private school and who got tutors when she dropped below an A-, who took the SAT 5 times and submitted her best score, who hired a consultant (this is a real thing) who told her what extracurriculars to take to look attractive to college admissions, who could afford space camp and clarinet lessons because she didn't have to get an after school job with Pedro Publicschool who had none of those advantages?This isn't me making a plea for fairness. I'm asking, how do you tell which students are better? Race-based admissions are sloppy and ultimately not going to work. But we don't have a better solution.</comment>

<comment>Except the race-based system assumes Tracy Trailerpark has advantages over Geraldo Gatedcommunity.  Because her methhead parents were white.</comment>

<comment>This is it right here! ^^^It's the same terrible reasoning that racial profiling is built upon.</comment>

<comment>indeed, most of the URM admits to the elite schools are at least middle class (many quite upper middle class and some even very wealthy).  What some people utterly fail to appreciate is that these gaps cut across SES lines.  Poor whites perform about as well on the SAT as rich blacks (similar outcomes in GPA and other tests too).  Thus clumsy racial preferences per se are necessary to achieve much "diversity" and many people fail to realize that the biggest (supposed) beneficiaries of these preferences are actually high SES URMs, often over and above low SES whites and asians.</comment>

<comment>The diversity they're seeking is false.  They want to get a rainbow selection from the same gated communities and prep schools.  Actual diversity- of experience and opinion- isn't actually desired.</comment>

<comment>Yet, a compelling narrative actually does work for the methhead kids too.My very blonde and white sister received a Tuskegee Airmen scholarship because she wrote a compelling narrative about how her background showed "diversity" and overcoming barriers.</comment>

<comment>But she didn't get a 200 point plus-up to her SAT because she was from an advantaged background simply by having white skin.</comment>

<comment>Maybe she did under your complaint framework. ..  ee have no idea how her test scores compared to the competition. It isn't like there is that sort of arbitrary "plus up" in the Policies You Are Whining About.  That is the point. </comment>

<comment>Ah, I see.  Yes, I don't know what your imagination is telling you.</comment>

<comment>These universities have said over and over again that AA is NOT based on the logic you are proposing. They've been clear, over and over again, that the motivation behind AA is that a diverse community benefits the university....and they have to be clear about this, because the motivation you just described constitutes racial preference and would cause AA to be removed.</comment>

<comment>Nope, it most often is based on wanting a population that more closely matches the makeup of the broader population the institution they are trying to serve.  Past discrimination has almost nothing to do with it.If minority groups were being accepted at rates equal to their proportion of the potential applicant pool, folks wouldn't bat an eye about not considering race, etc.  But the fact is that those groups are not being accepted at those rates, so institutions are interested in bringing that diversity into their organization.  No quotas or fixed "bonus" typically, but certainly enhanced outreach and maybe a "hard look" at whether the totality of the application indicates the person is qualified.</comment>

<comment>No, that's not the way it works.</comment>

<comment>Yes,  yes it is. </comment>

<comment>No, it is not (not, not, not).</comment>

<comment>All legacy admissions also exclude someone more qualified. There is a human who George W Bush bumped out of Harvard.</comment>

<comment>Yale. But your point is well taken.</comment>

<comment>I was thinking of the Business School and forgot where this unqualified student went to college.</comment>

<comment>Poppy and Grandpa Prescott both went to Yale, and apparently did well, and were baseball stars.</comment>

<comment>Are they counted against the class cap?</comment>

<comment>No argument from me.  That being said, George Bush was reasonably intelligent, his academic record is superior to Obama's.    It is rather ironic that our last two Presidents were beneficiaries of discriminatory policies.</comment>

<comment>No they weren't. Bush was a C student. No one has released Obama's grades from Occidental or Columbia. Right-wingers assume he had poor grades, as they can't conceive of a black man being intelligent, and also this feeds their victim narrative. But he graduated magna cum laude from Harvard, so we know his law school grades were very good.So I have no idea how you could possibly conclude Obama's grades were worse than Bush's.</comment>

<comment>But no slots go to anyone based on race. Students get admissions based on dozens of factors of which race is one. So is geography. And parent's income. And legacy status. And a dozen other things that have nothing to do with ability.Using your logic if, say, UT decides to increase the slots they give to foreign students, it's a policy that by definition is exclusionary towards Americans, and Americans should feel something is taken from them.</comment>

<comment>I am very much in favor of minorities getting into great colleges.  I don't necessarily mind affirmative action...I would prefer it not be needed.  There is nothing inferior about any race.  Unfortunately, lack of parenting and preparation is an equal opportunity denier of opportunity.  However, there is no serious academic study regarding the issue of race that will be seen as independent and authoritative.  The tribalism of our nation ensures that.  Being a researcher who finds uncomfortable truths is a great way to be demoted from the tribe currently in charge of academia.Ask a tribal conservative about affirmative action that is race based and then ask a tribal liberal about those football players with a 17 ACT.  You will get the same answer.Families, parents, and the values they transmit to children are the most significant variables in the equation and they are almost never mentioned.</comment>

<comment>What you said is why I almost can't watch college football anymore.  At a number of institutions, you have a large number of athletes with academic "mismatch".  Universities look the other way because of the profit generated from athletic events.</comment>

<comment>The other side is that 100s of 100s of young men, often minority men, receive structure and male leadership and are introduced to the rigors of sport.  The most successful minority men I know are products of good families with a strong male influence, college sports, or the military.</comment>

<comment>Pffft. Anyone who has been forced to sit in even the more basic, easier college classes with those football prima donnas since the 1970s knows they are dumber than a box of rocks and rarely go on to do well in life, despite enormous hand holding and entitlement privileges from the time they could toss a ball. If those males are that squishy academically that they need all those advantages, then that is reason enough not to penalize others in order to create a false bottom for the undeserving that enriches these $multimillion coaches, athletic programs and tv networks. Make those corporate college football programs what they already are - NFL farm teams and in too many instances a prison gateway. Remove them from the academy and leave the schools alone so actual students can intellectually learn and succeed. We've corrupted and dumbed down enough of our society for gambling and entertainment. </comment>

<comment>Some yes, some no.</comment>

<comment>There's a guard on the Ravens whose a mathematician.  They aren't all stupid.</comment>

<comment>Actually that's a myth. Athletes tend o do better academically than a general population of non-athletes. That may be because competing at sports teaches discipline, responsibility, and time management, because it provides connections, because it gives people goals and focus, because athletes tend to be popular and that kind of charisma/social skills carries over into other areas of life, because it makes people more comfortable with competition and being judged, or because we worship athletes and give them things. While it's true that elite athletes at big sport schools can slide on classes and are encouraged (if not outright ordered) to take easy majors and let the work slide, they're usually still better off. And that only describes a small amount of the student-athlete population.</comment>

<comment>Which athletes are you talking about? Yes the swimmers, divers, and cross country people are pretty smart. However "dumb as a box of rocks" is a pretty good description of just about every college basketball and football player. Easily 90% from what I've seen.</comment>

<comment>How much of that is the intrinsic value of sport, and how much of that is being let into a rarefied world where people treat you like a god? The current NCAA is an ethical nightmare.</comment>

<comment>These "student" athletes are also disproportionately represented in college rape cases. Which is probably why the media goes out of its way to create fictional rapists like Haven Monahan. We wouldn't want to notice who is actually doing the raping.</comment>

<comment>yeah, we gotta control those lacrosse players...</comment>

<comment>Interesting that you would choose lacrosse there. It indicates that you know the truth but are actively suppressing it.</comment>

<comment>Actively suppressing?  I disagree.  If, in fact the phenomena you are alluding to is a matter of fact...I would think your quarrel might be with the universities who have decided to accept this alleged risk in order to maximize athletic department revenue.  I used lacrosse players because one can find examples of bad college student behavior across the board.</comment>

<comment>Well read the left-leaning and feminist press, then, because they report extensively on rapist athletes. Or you can prefer to feel like a poor oppressed victim.</comment>

<comment>You're right. I'm the real victim, not women who have been raped. They were probably sluts anyway.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Your beliefs hurt minorities more than the racists'.</comment>

<comment>Very true.</comment>

<comment>The switch to the "diversity" argument was so it would never not be needed.</comment>

<comment>It's true that ultimately, family matters more than school in determining whether a student will succeed (although you ignore the fact that the two are connected - a big reason why elite schools produce elite graduates isn't the quality of the instruction as much as the peer group).And don't play the victim card. There have been "studies" by academics, published ones, that claim to show difference in intelligence between the races. They're not taken seriously because they're shoddy, and almost exclusively done by people with obvious biases. The fact is showing a meaningful correlation would be incredibly difficult to prove. For hundreds of years it was established fact that women were so stupid they could have no part in civic life, let alone the intellectual world. Now they often outperform men in fields like medicine and law. There's no consensus on what race even is, for humans (although the majority view is humans are remarkable genetically similar) and there's even less consensus on how to define intelligence, let alone measure it.</comment>

<comment>One unfortunate side issue also is that people that attend schools where they are an academic "mismatch" who do not thrive (i.e, GPA >3.0) are also less competitive at job fairs.  I have served as a recruiter at campus job fairs and for engineering jobs, it's tough out there unless you have a 3.0 GPA or higher.  That's a concern because it's very difficult to pull up a low GPA if one starts out on the wrong foot.</comment>

<comment>Thomas Sowell: "Despite much media spin, the issue is not whether blacks in general should be admitted to higher ranked or lower ranked institutions. The issue is whether a given black student, with given academic qualifications, should be admitted to a college or university where he would not be admitted if he were white". No need to talk about anything else...</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Please, address the issue, not the semantics of media "spin": "The issue is whether a given black student, with given academic qualifications, should be admitted to a college or university where he would not be admitted if he were white". Yes or no? Why?</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>It is the crux of the case. How is it dishonest?</comment>

<comment>Of course it's a fair question. He's just unwilling to give an honest answer, as it'd expose his hypocrisy.</comment>

<comment>it conflicts with his political narrative so it has to be</comment>

<comment>No one is proposing that outright unqualified people be accepted.</comment>

<comment>Define "outright unqualified" people, please.</comment>

<comment>People who could not meet minimum qualifications.</comment>

<comment>And what, pray tell, are the "minimum qualifications"?</comment>

<comment>Whatever the school says they are, within reason.</comment>

<comment>So when you said "no one is proposing that outright unqualified people be accepted", all you meant to say is that no one is proposing that the schools will admit people lower than their own arbitrarily defined standard (which is designed to accomodate their affirmative action plans and which, btw, generally is not published).That seems to be a generally meaningless and non-falsifiable proposition.</comment>

<comment>Yes."That seems to be a generally meaningless and non-falsifiable proposition."No, it's simply a statement that I think universities could admit someone on the lower end of their acceptable list over someone slightly higher based on their, since really, these standards are pretty arbitrary.  And I think that's what most people are proposing.</comment>

<comment>Academic standards are not arbitrary and they are highly predictive.  Admitting people because they are "diverse", "well rounded", and the like is arbitrary and does nothing to improve the academic quality of the schools, usually less than nothing, because the schools sacrifice meaningful academic characteristics in the name of these other nebulous goals (especially with respect to affirmative action and athletic recruiting where they play a very large quantitive role).I happen to think that AA actually harms blacks in several dimension because there is apt to be at least some truth to mismatch at the individual level and because there are externalities.  High SES blacks know they don't have to work as hard to get into good schools, so they learn less in high school, develop weaker study habits, etc.  What many of them don't know is how poorly they measure up academically (especially ex ante, but some ex post too).  This tends to increase perceptions of racism, bias, and the like and because admitted blacks really are much weaker academically it tends to amplify white and asian negative perceptions of black ability.  Most employers also know that blacks aren't admitted under the same standards and often don't perform at nearly the same level in school (see: GPA, major choice, etc) so the arguable benefits of these programs is much reduced, even for those black admits that would have otherwise been admitted to similarly ranked schools.....</comment>

<comment>"High SES blacks know they don't have to work as hard to get into good schools"Suuuuuuuuure they do</comment>

<comment>If they have a half-decent test score and don't completely blow off school, they really don't.</comment>

<comment>Where's your concern about the rich white kid who doesn't have to study because he's a legacy or his dad belongs to the same country club as the college Admissions Dean?Actually, studies show that minority students are more likely to get advanced degrees, even in the STEM subjects, at top universities, compared to lower-tracked ones (excluding HBCUs).And you're a fool if you think that universities admit students only on the basis of academic performance, except for black kids and athletes. They don't. They admit students with the right extracurriculars. With cool volunteer experience. Who have a military background. Etc.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>The "very real problems" theoretically proposed by opponents of AA. You left that part out.</comment>

<comment>Having spent years working in an extremely selective university's admissions office, I'd just like to say that it would be very difficult to overstate the role that AA plays in the admissions process.  Ethnicity played a significantly larger role in actual admissions decisions than test scores, GPAs, or even money.I saw the effect firsthand - black students felt tokenized, like they were props so their white peers could feel good about going to a diverse school.  These kids aren't stupid, they realize after talking it over with their peers that if they got in with five hundred fewer points on the SAT and a lower GPA than the white or Asian kids, there must have been some other factor at work.  Do you have any idea how it makes a kid feel to realize "huh, the university set a way lower standard for me 'cause I'm black?"  Do you think they feel valued for who they are and what they accomplished, or for the way they look?  That's incredibly messed up; it's a big part of the reason I got the hell out of that field.  Affirmative action was created by well-meaning people who genuinely wanted to help, but it is not working out the way they intended.  It's bad for students of every race, not to mention the most vulnerable socioeconomic groups in our society.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>What is "concern trolling?"  You genuinely think that kids don't feel that way?  Jesus, I've heard it directly from undergrads verbatim; "[University] admitted me for a quota, I realize that."  It's sick, and it ends up hurting the kids more than anyone.  The extremely talented ones too, not just the kids who can't compete academically!  How do you think they feel, knowing that prospective employers are assuming they got in where they did because of their race, rather than talent?</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>It's not "heard whatever," it's "worked in an extremely selective admissions environment for years."And seriously?  That's baffling that you think I'm faking concern for them.  WTF?  Why the hell would I even bother to post a comment if I wasn't concerned?  You really think I care so much about...I'm not even sure what...that I'd write up an enormous, completely insincere comment just to spite you?  Christ, dude, it's just a conversation.  Nobody's beating anyone or gaining anything here.</comment>

<comment>OrangePolicy has a specific left viewpoint and will label those who disagrees with it as either troll, some sort of bigot, racist, etc.  Don't worry about it.</comment>

<comment>"got in with five hundred fewer points on the SAT "What?  That's a bold claim</comment>

<comment>A few hundred would be a lot.</comment>

<comment>The average black-white difference in selective schools is around 200 points on the SAT alone, about 1 national standard deviation, and similar SD gaps in HSGPA (which includes the effects of athletic recruiting, legacies, endowment admission decisions, etc etc).  However, there are a significant number of URMs with scores much further below the non-URM mean.....</comment>

<comment>200 is not 500</comment>

<comment>That is the _average_ difference.  Some of them are 500+ below the non-URM mean.</comment>

<comment>I'm saying that 200 points isn't all that big of a deal, 500 is</comment>

<comment>200 points is a big deal actually and my point is that about half of them have score deltas appreciably larger than that.  Combining SAT with equal weighted HSGPA to form an even stronger predictor, aka "academic index", yields a larger predictive difference even without taking differential validity into account (blacks are significantly *overpredicted* by this measure, particularly with respect to HSGPA).  As a result of these preferences, most of them are clustered in the bottom 10-20% of schools.</comment>

<comment>200 points is a hell of a big deal when 10 points means the difference between admit and deny for hundreds and hundreds of kids.  200 points, good god, that runs the gamut from perfect score all the way down to noncompetitive (unless the applicant is a sought-after minority, a legacy, an athlete, very rich, or some combination of these.)  When I say selective, I mean ~10% admitted out of tens of thousands, that's what makes the five hundred point figure (which I've seen happen in person,) so galling.</comment>

<comment>I took the SAT twice and my score went up like 70 points.  It's not like I was that much smarter a month later.  200 points= not a big deal. If 1600 is perfect, 1400 is non-competitive?  What?  1400 is a very high score.  Sheesh.</comment>

<comment>Depends on the university.  Yes, core 1400 was well into the non-competitive range (by about 110 points) in our office.  I'm not saying it's a good system, it's a screwed up and idiotic system, but that's the reality of it.</comment>

<comment>OK, well, that's... I don't know what to say about that.</comment>

<comment>1) A 70 point test-retest difference is unusually high.2) Many people scoring 1600 would have scored even higher in reality (ceiling effects).3) There is an almost 1 standard deviation difference between 1400 and 1600.  If you aggregate these differences the probability of the average value converging on the expected value is basically 1.4) There is ample evidence to suggest that the SAT-outcome (e.g., GPA) relationships are roughly linear and continuous.  In other words, a "true" (without ceiling effects) 1600 can be expected to outperform a 1400 by roughly the same amount a 1400 outperforms a 1200, i.e., on average if you control for other characteristics or sample the population at random.  Again, in individual cases you may find the 1400 outperforming the 1600, especially with different GPAs and the like, but on average two groups with these scores can be expected to perform much differently.</comment>

<comment>"1) A 70 point test-retest difference is unusually high."Is it?  I must have been sleepy the first time, who knows.4) so what?</comment>

<comment>The "so what" is that 200 points is large difference in either direction. The majority of blacks are admitted under a wildly different admissions standard and it shows time and time again in the outcomes.   Moreover, you should be aware that (1) similar gaps exist in HSGPA (2) the tests actually *overpredict* URM outcomes (3) URMs do not "catch up" (4) other important outcomes like graduation rates, STEM/major attrition, and the like reflect this too....</comment>

<comment>A 70-point retest difference isn't that high. If it were, then why would ambitious and high-achieving students (whose parents are the same way) make an industry out of SAT classes and SAT Prep? Elite students "take" the SAT a dozen times, if not the actual test, than practice ones under test-like conditions.</comment>

<comment>A 70 point SAT score difference between test administrations is VERY unusual.  Most SAT tutors / classes / prep classes make a difference of approximately 20 points for anyone who was in the top half of the distribution the first time they took the SAT or a practice version to establish a baseline.  The improvement might be as high as 50 points for someone who did very poorly the first time, but worked hard to improve.</comment>

<comment>the thing that many people miss is that the average differences obscures the distributional differences.   In practical terms there is very little overlap between blacks and whites/asians based on SAT and a realistic assessment of their high school transcript amongst the elite schools (nominal HS GPA gaps are large too, but even larger if you consider the classes taken and grading standards).  This is a direct result of large affirmative action preferences</comment>

<comment>Yeah, and the sad thing is, I toned down some of the reality because I didn't think people would believe the truth.  I have literally seen kids with sub-20 ACTs and GPAs in the mid-twos be admitted to a university where the ACT average has hovered between 32 and 34.  Kids with no calculus and no physics being accepted into highly rigorous science programs which are considered some of the most selective in the world.  Moreover, many of them are given enormous scholarships on top of that.  It really, really sucks, most of all for the kids of "sought-after" ethnicities who didn't need any lowered standards to get in - they spend their lives having people assume they only got where they were because of handouts, which isn't true.Again, it's not the kids' fault - I'd damn sure take the offer if I was in their shoes.  But it's bad for the university, bad for the kids, and bad for the national conversation on race, all for the dubious benefit of being able to quote statistics that make the school seem racially inclusive when in reality it's enormously stratified.</comment>

<comment>Honestly, don't take this personally because maybe you really did see these things, but it's the internet and anyone can claim anything on the internet.  My personal experience was the there were a handful of minority students at my school who were outright idiots and a roughly equal percentage of white students who were way too stupid to be there.  But both groups were exceedingly small and this was at a highly-ranked college with an AA program.  A GPA in the mid-twos was disqualifying no matter where you were from.  So I don't know. We also didn't have much of a sports program so there's that."they spend their lives having people assume they only got where they were because of handouts"See, here's the other thing.  I never once heard anyone say "man I wish there weren't AA because now everyone thinks I'm stupid."  It was more like "I'm glad to be here and if people think I'm stupid that's because they're prejudiced".  But obviously I haven't met everyone in the world.</comment>

<comment>Wow - that's nuts. </comment>

<comment>It's probably also a big reason why many black students have been protesting this past year on college campuses.</comment>

<comment>By Sowell's measure George W. Bush Jr. should have never have been able to attend Yale University based on his academic qualifications. Bush Jr. got into Yale based on legacy.There are also those such as Meg Whitman's son who got into Princeton after she made a large donation to the university. Nobody seems to complain about systems that give the affluent a disproportionate advantage based their position, legacy or wealth. But let a black or Latino person try to advance in society by being given the opportunity to attend an elite school and all hell breaks loose.</comment>

<comment>I agree, drop all preferences. Neither you nor Orange addressed the specific issue of the case though. Dancing around the edges.</comment>

<comment>There were students that had better academic records than Fisher both black and white that got rejected from UT-Austin. It was her race that was the determining factor in her rejection, there was just other candidates that had better qualifications than she did.Well rounded students with really strong academic records don't have a problem getting into high quality universities. They many not get into their top pick but they can still get into great schools.It's students with marginal academic records that have compete with other students that for the most part complain when they don't get into an elite school.</comment>

<comment>The specific issue is Abigail Fisher was in the middle of what UT was accepting that year (in terms of grades and SAT scores), not the top. Excluding the students of all ethnicities admitted under the 10% rule, the number of black students admitted with worse grades than her is quite small, and is almost certainly not why she didn't get in.The other issue is the quota system was largely done away with decades ago because it didn't work. We know that. The issue is how can a competitive university ensure they get the Tyrone Hayeses over the Dick Cheneys? That's a valid goal, and just looking at grades and SAT scores in a vacuum won't get you there.</comment>

<comment>Not really.  The case is about a white student that did not get admitted because she was not in top 10%ile  of local Texans that would get 75% of positions available and  get accepted automatically and she expected to be admitted because she is white.  The 75% positions is already a form of affirmative action for Texans.</comment>

<comment>But again, why is Sowell (and Scalia) limiting this paean to meritocracy to race? Where is the weeping for all those students who aren't legacies, aren't rich, aren't military, aren't child actors, aren't from North Dakota, who lose out on a university spot to any of the above?The fact is, colleges have never just looked at grades and SAT scores (and the latter would unfairly favour rich kids over poor ones). Yet all the court challenges, all the outrage, only focuses on black and Latino students. And not all the other ones who are admitted to college for less than pure reasons.</comment>

<comment>I think participants in this debate should all read Claude Steele's Whistling Vivaldi: How Stereotypes Affect Us and What We Can Do.  He puts forth an excellent science base argument that negative stereotypes impact performance.  Tell a group before a round of miniature golf that the left handers do worse, and the left handers will do worse.   I'm not able to do justice to his extensive argument in this space, but it does have implications on evaluating academic performance.  Two equally competent students could perform differently on the same exam because of what society  has told them and not because of effort or ability because the exam isn't actually measuring their skills.I attended a university that (it is now illegal) at the time aggressively sought out minority candidates.  I never met any who didn't seem intelligent and in most cases better students than myself.  My conclusion is it is mostly a myth that minority students admitted with different standards are unable to do the work.</comment>

<comment>I think this is called the Pygmalion Effect in education.</comment>

<comment>not-- evidently you are unfamiliar with either the myth or the play.</comment>

<comment>Read this smartypants:https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/...</comment>

<comment>The alternative conclusion based on Steele's research is that overemphasis on group identities is harmful to individual achievement.  Education is fundamentally an individual process. The concept is carefully framed as "stereotyping", implying external agency, but lots of notions about what a 'real' member of a group are like come from within.  The very identity politics fed by this sort of argument could be contributing to the harm. </comment>

<comment>Most of the American elite universities (Cornell, Columbia, Pennsylvania, Yale) had draconian quotas for Jewish students in the past. Should the Jews benefit now from the AA, too, as a compensation for the discrimination they were subjected to?</comment>

<comment>To me it is obvious that Scalia is trying to declare the given  study to be supreme over others by pumping a racist angle through it because he is racist.  Who on earth would believe that Scalia cares for some black students unhappy adventures in universities by trying to support a white student who is seeking to get accepted, I don't.  Prior evidence shows that he has pumped for CitizenUnited that allows the wealthy to buy the government so he has ruled for cash over merit in the past. It is unfortunate that people are unwilling to connect the dots and realize that Scalia is actually a  racist hack although the evidence and his comments are before them.The fact is that if students fail to pass their courses, they won't graduate and so the spots are given to others.    So why is it that this judge with prior history  believes that that will hurt the students and identify them as blacks who are to be harmed by it  if he hasn't given a damn about faith of minorities before.So either Scalia is ranting using gobldygook and trying to throw the case because he is ashamed of his conduct in the past or he has no clue.  That is a given.</comment>

<comment>One would make the courses easier (or concoct easier courses) so the students can pass them.  Isn't this a natural extension of preference in admissions?</comment>

<comment>But the study is saying that the mismatch causes harm and it does not say that the courses are modified so you are making that up.  In fact with 75% o students being supposedly the top  Texas top 10%ile,  majority should be already declared to have graduated given the doctrine.</comment>

<comment>The problem is that people are individuals. I work in Institutional Research for a large public and one of the things we do is predict success rates for various students based on various demographics (we do this in order to identify students that are going to have a more difficult time so that they can be given extra attention.) The number one predictor of graduation is high school GPA. The higher the GPA, the higher the chance they will graduate. It matters more than test scores, race, gender or income. That being said, our models are only accurate to a point. I can look at an individual student and say 'It's likely they're going to drop out.' And indeed, most students that are in that profile WILL drop out, but there are those students who have bad test scores, bad high school GPAs, come from a low income family and are male minorities that defy the odds. They come here, they get serious and they work their tails off and get their degrees. I think that those people are who Affirmative Action really helps. The people that maybe have really screwed up in the past and when they change their environments and mature, they buckle down and do what needs to be done. I'm inclined to think that there's a place for those people. The way I look at it is that if there's a marginal Asian female and a slightly more marginal African American male, it's certainly unfair to the Asian female to pick the African American. At the same time though, she's likely to go out and do well somewhere else regardless. For an African American male, it may mean the difference between minimum wage jobs his whole life or breaking into the middle class. Even if he has a lower chance of succeeding than the Asian female, I think there is value in providing the opportunity. I don't know. I could be wrong. I certainly understand the counter-argument, but I'm not completely sold on just blind admissions.</comment>

<comment>Meritocracy, meritocracy, and meritocracy. Nothing else. Talented students from poor families should be supported by special stipends. Those who under-perform should be kept out of the universities regardless of their skin color. Simple, no?</comment>

<comment>Why are you eating like pure meritocracy exists ANYWHERE in the admissions process. Skin color is only one of dozens of ways it does not, yet it's the only one conservatives care about.</comment>

<comment>You make it sound like the black student has one shot at college. Why can't he find that opportunity in a community college? A community college is a better place for someone to get their academic sea legs anyway. That you would screw over the woman just because of her race is just...racist.</comment>

<comment>There is a very important question that you neglect: Does the admission of academically inferior students diminish the academic rigor of the institution?  (That is, does the institution reduce its academic standards in order to give the academically inferior students a chance to graduate?)EDIT: Let me give an example.  When I was at XYZ University, there was a major called "Managerial Studies" that seemed populated mostly by football and basketball players.</comment>

<comment>You know the answer, right?</comment>

<comment>"Does the admission of academically inferior students diminish the academic rigor of the institution? "Attending college is pretty much once you get thrown in the pool you either sink or swim. Most schools have resources to help students that are having problems academically.</comment>

<comment>If you are looking for rigor.  The people who have graduated more than 20 years ago like Scalia himself would not be qualified because the content has been made more difficult.Perhaps we have to test everyone all the time to see if they deserve their degrees.    Lets see if they can even pass current standards of highschool math and sciences and if they don't pull their degrees.</comment>

<comment>"EDIT: Let me give an example. When I was at XYZ University, there was a major called "Managerial Studies" that seemed populated mostly by football and basketball players."And does this mean that you went to an inferior school? Do you feel uneducated as a result?</comment>

<comment>Only a Sith deals in absolutes.  Fact is, if you cull the low achievers from any school you can increase the rigor for the remaining students.</comment>

<comment>As someone with experience in academia, while teaching in one particular honors program that was under some pressure to show a better racial mix, I actually did receive explicit pressure from administrators -- verbal, not in writing -- to approve theses from several minority students that would not have been approved simply graded in a race blind way.The good news I guess is that the pressure wasn't to lower standards across the board.  The bad news is, yes, it really was direct pressure to grade the minority students differently than the white students.</comment>

<comment>That's completely different, because those athletes aren't at school to get an education and everyone knows it.</comment>

<comment>the ugly, wrongheaded belief in black inferiority that persists in bigoted enclaves, like the comments section of any Atlantic article dealing with crime, education, health care, or voting rights.</comment>

<comment>I believe in racial equality. Based on this belief, I demand that equal admission criteria will be applied regardless of race or ethnicity.</comment>

<comment> I demand that equal admission criteria will be applied regardless of race or ethnicity.That would be a nice change, since we've never done this in the history of the country.</comment>

<comment>criteria that just happens to benefit white people</comment>

<comment>Shh, you'll ruin the posturing by pointing out uncomfortable facts like that.</comment>

<comment>Propose any criteria you find appropriate, provided they are:1) purely academic2) equal to any person</comment>

<comment>Ignoring history, as you propose, does not make anyone "equal".</comment>

<comment>As I already mentioned, Jews were discriminated against in the best American universities in the past. Should they benefit from the AA, too?</comment>

<comment>Comparing the discrimination Jews faced to slavery is so dishonest I cannot believe even you would write such a thing. Inventing that paradigm makes you look uneducated and extreme, not to mention contemptuous for the plight of other minorities.Jews are white now. Your entire comment is a false premise.</comment>

<comment>I do not compare it to slavery. But the Jews were discriminated against, it's a fact. Do they deserve compensation in any form, or it's OK to discriminate Jews?</comment>

<comment>They got compensation. They got to become white.I'm not going to respond to this dishonest attempt by you to shift the topic and feed your false persecution complex.</comment>

<comment>They 'became' white because they preferred to work hard, rather than whine (wouldn't help them anyway) and strive to be better than whites. That was the only way for them to be accepted to the white society.</comment>

<comment>This is like the opposite of what happened.</comment>

<comment>So what happened?</comment>

<comment>I seem to remember one of the issues that anti-semites had with Jews is that Jews are too successful.</comment>

<comment>That's correct. Or, as Churchill said: "We in Britain are not antisemites, because we do not consider Jews better than us."</comment>

<comment>So then being successful and working hard didn't always benefit Jews, did it? I'm just asking because don't want to end up in a world where everyone thinks Mexicans are secretly controlling the banks.</comment>

<comment>People will always be jealous, but the Jews, as a group, just reject mediocrity, even if certain people are pissed off. BTW, are you one of those, who think that Jews Mexicans secretly control the banks?</comment>

<comment>So sometimes being hard-working had the opposite effect, right? In the end the ruling majority will change the rules if they don't like the results and there's not much minorities can do about that.I think the banks are mostly likely controlled by the people listed as "CEO" and "Boardmembers" on their websites. A controversial position I know.</comment>

<comment>The Jews in America is one of the most successful ethnic groups. But that's because America is a free country, in addition to their hard work. Even in the Soviet Union they were successful in spite of the institutionalized anti-semitism there. But of course everybody is free to choose being lazy and mediocre.</comment>

<comment>Very beautifully done, my friend.  I couldn't have said it better myself. Thank you very much!Moreover, if you are an illegal alien and mooch off every government program in this country, you are treated like a hero, while we the hard working citizens of this country, are treated as the hated villains for insisting that the laws in this country be kept!It honestly makes me feel like I am living in the "Twilight Zone" or "Alice in Looking Glass Land" where down is up, up is down, etc., etc.</comment>

<comment>CEOs and Boardmembers are open for everybody to see, but you were talking of secret control. Come on, don't evade the question, tell us what you think.</comment>

<comment>You are a horrid liar and showing some very clear bigotry right here.That's not what happened, at all.</comment>

<comment>Bummer! After your first comments today I thought (hoped) the therapy you have recently undergone succeeded.</comment>

<comment>I'm being far more respectful than your bigoted lies here deserve.It takes some real dishonesty to magnify the suffering faced by Jews, lie about how they became white, and then at the same time diminish and ignore discrimination against blacks.</comment>

<comment>Many Jews have received reparations from Germany, and the eventual statehood of Israel under the mandate of the United Nations in many ways can be seen as compensation for the suffering that Jews endured as a result of the Holocaust.</comment>

<comment>Tragically, Jewish blood has always been very very cheap.  It will not change until Moshiach (the Messiah) comes.</comment>

<comment>"Jews are white now."  LOL!  What a racist comment.</comment>

<comment>This comment is awaiting moderation. Show comment.</comment>

<comment>Bravo, Bradan! The next step will be slinging your feces around, as you usually do when faced with facts that clearly contradict your twisted worldview.</comment>

<comment>You should be careful Ariel, jumping into bed with white supremacists and the like will prove your claims of supporting equality false.</comment>

<comment>Lovely thing coming from the un-circumcised creature.</comment>

<comment>purely academic= criteria that just happens to benefit white people</comment>

<comment>Academia should have academic admission criteria, otherwise it stops being academia.Just like NBA should have sport achievements and ability admission criteria, otherwise it stops being what it is - the best basketball league in the world.</comment>

<comment>That's a terrible analogy.  It's really easy to establish whether or not a ball did, in fact, go into the hoop, while it's much tougher to say "this essay is a quality essay" or "this math is important while this math is not".</comment>

<comment>Right, this is tougher, but this is exactly what the professors are good at.</comment>

<comment>Professors don't typically handle undergrad admissions</comment>

<comment>The academic staff do.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I mean its the atlantic. I assume the economist didn't want him?</comment>

<comment>Ironically Conor might be their affirmative action hire. </comment>

<comment>If sophistry were given merit points, he would be an immediate hire. As it is, the main point in his favour is that he displays the folly of the assumption that there is a plausible case to be made for a libertarian-conservative amalgam.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Are you familiar with the distinction between sophistry and logical argument? Google "logical fallacy".</comment>

<comment>Writing this on this article is rather hilarious, given how off base this article is compared to what social scientists actually think about this "theory" that is so popular among certain ideological positions.The irony is this entire piece is ideological fluff more than anything else. This "theory" gets prominence because he's a libertarian, and he likes it. Not because it has any evidence supporting it. </comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>You agree with his ideological biases, so you rate him far far higher than I do. I see many of his articles as nothing more than trying to force reality to fit within the political paradigm he prefers.You ignored completely the substantive critique of this article, by the way. </comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Wow, Bradan, you're talking business today.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Conor did take a position, he lent his bully pulpit to an activist and scholar and gave him credibility by setting this up as an inherently "two sides" battle, when the preponderance of evidence so far is against that scholar.Let me use an extreme example. It'd be like quoting that "Ancient Aliens" guy in a historical piece as being "part of the debate". Sanders is far more serious than him, even if I think he's more ideologue than scholar on the topic, but the credibility gap is the issue I'm trying to illustrate.https://www.insidehighered.com...Here's a link, so you know I'm not just inventing this. "Mismatch theory" is politicized because of it's proponents.</comment>

<comment>Scalia would be a mismatch for the Supreme Court if merit rather than ideology were among the selection criteria. He would fail both the judicial temperament  and logical consistency parts of the exam.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>He says he is a "literalist". Scalia ignores his own previous opinions without compunction. And in this case, according to his constitutional theory the factual consequences of AA (if mismatch 'theory' is correct) should have no bearing on whether rights have been violated.</comment>

<comment>He was an "affirmative action" hire, at least according to Reagan era officials. Funny that. His Italian ethnicity was a major part of being picked.</comment>

<comment>Many others of Italian ancestry would have been and are well qualified on actual merit. The same can be said substituting "Catholic" for "Italian".The true epitome of this was  Nixon's attempt to appoint two racists to court defended as necessary for balance."Even if he is mediocre, there are a lot of mediocre judges and people and lawyers, and they are entitled to a little representation, aren't they?"http://content.time.com/time/s...</comment>

<comment>"ugly, wrongheaded belief in black inferiority that persists in bigoted enclaves. "Oh come on. We believe that blacks commit more violent crimes which is true. We believe that black cities are slaughterhouses, which is true. That's not inferiority. They're winning at violent crime!</comment>

<comment>Sander is well known as a huge activist on this topic, and his "scholarship" was not published in peer-reviewed journals but in a student run law journal initially, and later in a book. His results have not been verifiable or replicated by independent scholars, and the fact that the biggest proponent for this so-called theory, that again has very little credibility outside certain political circles, also wrote the amicus brief and pretty much every other major source for this theory is a major red flag.This article errs in treating him with so much deference. He has no earned it, and either has his theory.</comment>

<comment>> but in a student run law journal initiallyEvery law journal is student run. That's how they work. This is a meaningless retort meant to sound impressive.</comment>

<comment>He created a social science theory and willfully chose not to publish it in any peer-reviewed journal. To my knowledge, he still has not published his theory in any peer-reviewed social science journal, choosing the friendly confines of his own websites and books.That matters. Anyone here who studied social sciences knows it. You can't sweep that under the rug.</comment>

<comment>You'll be happy to know you're wrong, as the link in the article you're responding to shows. You did click on that link right?https://www.washingtonpost.com...</comment>

<comment>You're also writing off law journals as if they are less prestigious than literally _any_ social science journal, which is silly. Sander is a law professor, and he developed his theory first in the context of law schools only. Why wouldn't be publish that in a law journal?</comment>

<comment>A link to the same activist proposing this theory, guest blogging on another libertarian's site?There is one link in that I find credible, but his tone does not inspire confidence that Sanders is anything more than an ideologue on his own personal crusade.</comment>

<comment>This is one long ad-hominem. I'm ignoring you from now on.</comment>

<comment>So you think the un-scholarly behavior of the major academic behind this theory is not relevant? Because that's not really how people think in these fields. When you break the line from scholar into activist people take note, and rightly so.The Duke study is interesting, so thank you for that, but I have no more reason to trust Sanders than I did before. I've seen those sort of academics before, and watched them run their personal crusades straight into popular media when scholarly media is skeptical. There's a reason that's looked down on.</comment>

<comment>I met some kids in my dorm freshman year that were in this thing called the S.T.E.P program. This kids enrolled in classes where they received no class credits and it was painfully obvious to everyone that these were the affirmative action admits. These classes consisted of remedial courses in English and Algebra. College kids taking a remediation course in algebra!. There were kids from my high school that got rejected from my school that took AP Calculus and there are kids taking a remedial algebra course!If you need a remedial course in Algebra, I can safely say you took a seat from someone and you were unqualified. </comment>

<comment>What a lovely and massive assumption. So someone immensely talented in their field but that struggled with math was unqualified?</comment>

<comment>Considering algebra is basically borderline basic math, I'd say my assumption is correct. </comment>

<comment>So, no matter how smart someone is in their major, no matter how good of a student, if they struggle with math, you're going to write them off?Some people just seem to enjoy trying to belittle others.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>Can you be mature enough not to troll for once? Or is that too much to ask?</comment>

<comment>Did someone actually admit to living in the dorms and then immediately scoff at the worthiness of remedial students?  I say eliminate dorms and the problem of "unworthy's" will be done.   Algebra...  hehehe. That's useful in the "real world".</comment>

<comment>Why would living in the dorms be bad?  Many-- I'd guess even most-- colleges require it at least for the first year.</comment>

<comment>I was merely being sarcastic.  Traditionally, prior to the last 20 years, dormitory living was not preferred  and populated by those at the "lower" end of the social spectrum, those who did not qualify for Greek life or who could not afford off-campus housing.  I was trying to use sarcasm to point out that the worthiness meter may be used against someone who clearly felt superior to the remedial students.  I find it fascinating that close to 100% of the posts has some sort of bias which seems perfectly justified in the mind of the poster.  Hence the challenge.  Everyone wants the field to be level or even angled against THEM to better feel worthy, while the challenges of others is minimized and trivialized.  The next step is to move to the "prove it" tactic... then the "you're trolling" tactic and finally, "learn to use punctuation".  Although the most popular "trending" counter is "YOU"RE RACIST".</comment>

<comment>Yes, being able to apply basic procedures without struggling is useful in the "real world".  If a student can not manage that, then they are not a serious candidate for higher education.</comment>

<comment>Uh huh.  Sort of snobby, no?  The are additional ways in the world to learn problem solving and critical thinking.  But if myopic, I am sure Algebra is the single avenue to critical thinking.   I don't think we are literally discussing Algebra as I was being a bit sarcastic but sarcasm is probably outside the lines for algebra.  Succeed at Algebra.  You will win in life.   Struggle with Algebra, you will fail.  Cool.</comment>

<comment>Depends on the major, if it is science/engineering of course you are not qualified.  If it is art or critical theory, sure, you can be retarded and still do those.</comment>

<comment>Thank you for proving my point.You two don't care about the students. You care about boosting your own egos by putting down others. That's what this subthread is really about.</comment>

<comment>Algebra is as easy as putting a square peg in a square hole.Not understanding algebra shows a person has below average intelligence. </comment>

<comment>Your comment shows below average intelligence, but that's the only thing it shows. Your "theory" there is bunk.</comment>

<comment>Do you know what algebra is Naidm? It doesn't involve advanced abstract thinking, you simply follow the basic rules as they were taught to you.</comment>

<comment>I know what Algebra is, and I also know how many top students in non-math fields struggle with it. I'm talking top 5% students.This is just an exercise for you all to boost your egos, like I said.</comment>

<comment>How is it possible that they could be measured as "the top 5% of students" if they struggle with algebra?   What is being measured to get them into the top 5%?</comment>

<comment>This thread has plenty of examples of you telling people to "turn down" their ego, to stop being immature, calling people trolls for disagreeing with you, etc.  I'm not sure acting superior about others belittling people is a smart move.I get that you're pissed off and that you're passionate about this, but you're doing a spectacularly bad job of representing your ideas, and I doubt that's what you intend.  Just talk, it's OK if someone disagrees with you.  If you actually think someone's a troll, the worst thing you could possibly do is respond to them, right?</comment>

<comment>Oh great. Another person who likes to lecture others on how to behave.I guess you really didn't like me calling out your false comments on the Yemen article.</comment>

<comment>Oh, I didn't realize it was the same person.  As for my "false comments" on Yemen...heh.  I invite any who would like to do so to go read my dialogue with this commenter on that piece; suffice it to say that his approach towards geopolitics is...narrow.Yes, obviously, when I see someone behaving badly and making himself look foolish, I feel like it's better to correct him than not.  Literally everything I've ever learned has come of the result of someone teaching me; I doubt it's any different for you.  No skin off my back if you want to make people here think you're emotional and lacking the facts to back up your assertions, is it?  By all means, feel free to ignore my advice, you certainly seem confident in your approach, haha.  : D</comment>

<comment>Sorry. Remedial algebra is the reddest of flags, almost as red as the inability to write a short coherent essay.</comment>

<comment>It's not at all.Prospective grad students struggle with the simple algebra on the GRE, and those are the higher end of students. The claim is entirely bullshit, a way for a few a**holes to boost their egos by diminishing others.</comment>

<comment>Do you have any, umm, stats or citations?</comment>

<comment>About the GRE? Go look on GRE test sites and read the anxiety online among grad students. Go talk to some. I'm in the process of prepping for the GRE myself right now. It's everywhere. You can see it on any GRE prep site.If you haven't used algebra in 8 years, you might struggle with it. Pretending that shows a lack of intelligence is troll logic.</comment>

<comment>Defensive, aren't we? And I suspect I will never struggle with algebra (except for the linear kind), not matter the disuseI was speaking of academic and statistical studies.</comment>

<comment>More like pissed off. If you want to jump in bed with these trolls, more power to you. Hurts your credibility, not mine.Not everyone is you. Turn down your ego and try to remember that.</comment>

<comment>So struggle with it for a few days and be good again like you were 8 years ago.... What exactly is the problem, that students should not be expected to exert effort?</comment>

<comment>Why are you shaming graduate students by airing these statistics?  If this is true it is a disaster of higher ed.   I hope to god they are not getting pell grants and scholarships that could be going to actual scholars.</comment>

<comment>I dunno man, I went to a very expensive "academically prestigious" (or so was the perception) Prep high school and I never even took Pre-Calc. I took a variation of statistics for 3 years. And i got into a fairly well regarded College and bc of my major I only had to take one year of Math in College (not Calc)....so I really don't think that is as big of a deal as you think it is, at least based on my anecdotal evidence.</comment>

<comment>It's not a stretch to interpret Scalia's remarks as racist. Yes, there seem to be plenty of well-intentioned, science-oriented people studying mismatch theory. The problem is that people like Scalia and Fisher and all those against affirmative action seem to only be concerned by that theory in its relation to race. Had Scalia spoken about students who benefit from legacy or athletic scholarships or the myriad other non-academic reasons young people are admitted to schools in addition to race, sure, fine. But he didn't. If we are going to have an honest discussion of mismatch theory, then it shouldn't be in the context of this case. We should be fair and honest and talk about getting rid of any factor that isn't GPA or SAT score. Which, by the way, would be a horrible mistake in my opinion.For analogy's sake, imagine Scalia had made the remark: "It could be very unsafe for black people to own guns." To me, that sounds pretty racist. You'd have to be overwhelmingly generous to defend that statement by saying, hey, he does have a point that guns overall are unsafe for everyone, including black people.</comment>

<comment>Here is a fact less then 5,000 African Americans scored 700 or better on the Math and Verbal sections of the SAT in 2015. Considering that no doubt many of those scoring 700 on one section are likely to be excellent students all around that means that there is less then 3,500 highly qualified Black students. Assuming the Ivies grab most if not all this cream of the crop, what is left for Elite State Schools? Discuss...</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

